Washington statutes.
RCW 7.68.061

Who not entitled to compensation.

If injury or death results to a victim from the deliberate intention of the victim himself or herself to produce such injury or death, or while the victim is engaged in the attempt to commit, or the commission of, a felony, neither the victim nor the widow, widower, child, or dependent of the victim shall receive any payment under this chapter.

If injury or death results to a victim from the deliberate intention of a beneficiary of that victim to produce the injury or death, or if injury or death results to a victim as a consequence of a beneficiary of that victim engaging in the attempt to commit, or the commission of, a felony, the beneficiary shall not receive any payment under this chapter.

If injury or death results to a minor victim from the deliberate intention of a legal guardian or custodian of the minor victim to produce the injury or death, or if injury or death results to a minor victim as a consequence of a legal guardian or custodian of the minor victim engaging in an attempt to commit, or the commission of, a felony, the legal guardian or custodian shall not receive any payment under this chapter.

An invalid child, while being supported and cared for in a state institution, shall not receive compensation under this chapter.

No payment shall be made to or for a natural child of a deceased victim and, at the same time, as the stepchild of a deceased victim.

[ 2020 c 308 s 2; 2011 c 346 s 305.]

NOTES:

Intent—Retroactive application—Effective date—2011 c 346: See notes following RCW 7.68.020.